Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.030

Possession without notice.

Whenever it shall appear to the director that any association is in an unsound or unsafe condition to continue business or is insolvent, the director may take possession thereof without notice.

[ 1994 c 92 s 456; 1945 c 235 s 104; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-223. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 68, 71.]